Hawaii statutes.
§315-3 Contracts under agreement. True
copies of all contracts made on behalf of the State pursuant to the Agreement
shall be kept on file in the office of the Hawaii teacher standards board and
in the office of the lieutenant governor. [L 1969, c 47, §3; am L 2004, c 21,
§3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next